Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 1
HOURS OF VOTING, REGISTRATION, OATHS,
AND ASSISTANCE TO VOTE

1-7-101. Hours of voting on election day.

All polling locations must be open continuously from 7 a.m. until 7 p.m. on election day. If a full set of election judges is not present at the hour of 7 a.m. and it is necessary for judges to be appointed to conduct the election as provided in section 1-6-113, the election may commence when two judges who are not of the same political affiliation for partisan elections are present at any hour before the time for closing the polling locations. The polling locations shall remain open after 7 p.m. until every eligible elector who was at the polling location at or before 7 p.m. has been allowed to vote. Except as provided in subsection (1)(b) of this section, any person arriving after 7 p.m. is not entitled to vote.

Any person may petition the district court for the county in which a polling location is located for an order requiring a polling location to remain open after 7 p.m. on election day. The district court shall grant the petition upon a finding that access to or voting at the polling location has been substantially impaired due to inclement weather, equipment failure, technological problems, voter suppression activities, a shortage of supplies, or other exigent circumstance.

If the condition impairing voting at or access to polling locations affects polling locations in more than one county, any person may petition the district court of the city and county of Denver for an order requiring the secretary of state to order all polling locations in all affected counties to remain open after 7 p.m. on election day. The district court shall grant the petition upon a finding that access to or voting at one or more polling locations in the affected counties has been substantially impaired due to inclement weather, equipment failure, technological problems, voter suppression activities, a shortage of supplies, or other exigent circumstance.

If an order is issued in accordance with this subsection (1)(b), every eligible elector who was at a polling location affected by the order at or before the closing time specified in the order shall be allowed to vote. The court shall not order polling locations to remain open for more than an additional six hours.

(1.5) Each drop box must be open until 7 p.m. on election day. Each drop box must remain open after 7 p.m. until every eligible elector who was in line at the drop box at or before 7 p.m. has been allowed to deposit all ballots the person brought in the drop box, subject to the limitation set forth in section 1-7.5-107 (4)(b)(I)(B).

Upon the opening of the polls, a proclamation shall be made by one of the judges that the polls are open, and, thirty minutes before the closing of the polls, a proclamation shall be made that the polls will close in thirty minutes.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 731, § 9, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 98:

(1) amended, p. 583, § 17, effective April 30.

L. 2013:

(1) amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 718, § 59, effective May 10.

L. 2019:

(1) amended, (HB 19-1278), ch. 326, p. 3027, § 35, effective August 2.

L. 2021:

(1.5) added, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1647, § 32, effective June 21.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-7-101 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

(1) For the date of general and primary elections, see § 1-1-104 (17) and (32).

(2) In 2013, subsection (1) was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

(3) For the short title ("Colorado Votes Act") in HB 19-1278, see section 1 of chapter 326, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

1-7-102. Employees entitled to vote.

Eligible electors entitled to vote at an election shall be entitled to absent themselves for the purpose of voting from any service or employment in which they are then engaged or employed on the day of the election for a period of two hours during the time the polls are open. Any such absence shall not be sufficient reason for the discharge of any person from service or employment. Eligible electors, who so absent themselves shall not be liable for any penalty, nor shall any deduction be made from their usual salary or wages, on account of their absence. Eligible electors who are employed and paid by the hour shall receive their regular hourly wage for the period of their absence, not to exceed two hours. Application shall be made for the leave of absence prior to the day of election. The employer may specify the hours during which the employee may be absent, but the hours shall be at the beginning or end of the work shift, if the employee so requests.

This section shall not apply to any person whose hours of employment on the day of the election are such that there are three or more hours between the time of opening and the time of closing of the polls during which the elector is not required to be on the job.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 732, § 9, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-7-102 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

For employer guilty of a misdemeanor for violation of this section, see § 1-13-719 (1)(b) and (2).

1-7-103. No voting unless eligible - first-time voters casting a ballot in person after having registered by mail to vote. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 732, § 9, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 94:

(2) amended, p. 1769, § 29, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 96:

(2) amended and (4) added, p. 1745, § 39, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(2) amended, p. 774, § 49, effective May 20.

L. 2003:

(5) added, p. 2078, § 14, effective May 22.

L. 2004:

(5)(c) amended, p. 1186, § 2, effective August 4.

L. 2005:

(5)(c) amended, p. 1404, § 24, effective June 6; (5)(c) amended, p. 1439, § 24, effective June 6.

L. 2013:

Entire section repealed, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 752, § 138, effective May 10.

Editor's note:

This section was similar to former § 1-7-103 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

In 2013, this section was repealed by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-7-104. Affidavits of eligibility.

In any election where the list of registered electors and property owners is not divided by precinct or where an elector's name is not on the list of registered electors or property owners, an affidavit signed by the eligible elector stating that the elector has not previously voted in the election may be required prior to allowing the elector to cast a ballot.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 733, § 9, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1416, § 64, effective July 1.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1162, § 33, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(2) amended, p. 840, § 58, effective July 1.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 1745, § 40, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 718, § 60, effective May 10.

Cross references:

In 2013, this section was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-7-105. Watchers at primary elections.

Each political party participating in a primary election shall be entitled to have a watcher in each precinct in the county. The state chair or the chairperson of the county central committee of each political party shall certify the persons selected as watchers on forms provided by the county clerk and recorder and submit the names of the persons selected as watchers to the county clerk and recorder. To the extent possible, the state chair or chairperson shall submit the names by the close of business on the Friday immediately preceding the election.

In addition, candidates for nomination on the ballot of any political party in a primary election shall be entitled to appoint some person to act on their behalf in every precinct in which they are a candidate. Each candidate shall certify the persons appointed as watchers on forms provided by the county clerk and recorder and submit the names of the persons selected as watchers to the county clerk and recorder. To the extent possible, the candidate shall submit the names by the close of business on the Friday immediately preceding the election.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 733, § 9, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 1977, § 22, effective August 3.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1647, § 33, effective June 21.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-7-202 as it existed prior to 1992.

1-7-106. Watchers at general and congressional vacancy elections.

Each participating political party or issue committee whose candidate or issue is on the ballot, and each unaffiliated and write-in candidate whose name is on the ballot for a general or congressional vacancy election, is entitled to have no more than one watcher at any one time in each voter service and polling center in the county and at each place where votes are counted in accordance with this article. The chairperson of the county central committee of each major political party, the county chairperson or other authorized official of each minor political party, the issue committee, or the write-in or unaffiliated candidate shall certify the names of one or more persons selected as watchers on forms provided by the county clerk and recorder and submit the names of the persons selected as watchers to the county clerk and recorder. To the extent possible, the chairperson, authorized official, issue committee, or candidate shall submit the names by the close of business on the Friday immediately preceding the election. The watchers shall surrender the certificates to the election judges at the time they enter the voter service and polling center and are sworn by the judges. This section does not prevent party candidates or county party officers from visiting voter service and polling centers or drop-off locations to observe the progress of voting.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 733, § 9, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 862, § 122, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1633, § 15, effective June 7.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 1978, § 23, effective August 3.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 718, § 61, effective May 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-7-104 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

In 2013, this section was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-7-107. Watchers at nonpartisan elections.

Candidates for office in nonpartisan elections, and proponents and opponents of a ballot issue, are each entitled to appoint one person to act as a watcher in every polling place in which they are a candidate or in which the issue is on the ballot. The candidates or proponents and opponents shall certify the names of persons so appointed to the designated election official on forms provided by the official and submit the names of the persons selected as watchers to the county clerk and recorder. To the extent possible, the candidate, proponent, or opponent shall submit the names by the close of business on the Friday immediately preceding the election.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 734, § 9, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1416, § 65, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 1978, § 24, effective August 3.

1-7-108. Requirements of watchers.

Watchers shall take an oath administered by one of the election judges that they are eligible electors, that their name has been submitted to the designated election official as a watcher for this election, and that they will not in any manner make known to anyone the result of counting votes until the polls have closed.

Neither candidates nor members of their immediate families by blood, marriage, or civil union to the second degree may be poll watchers for that candidate.

Each watcher shall have the right to maintain a list of eligible electors who have voted, to witness and verify each step in the conduct of the election from prior to the opening of the polls through the completion of the count and announcement of the results, to challenge ineligible electors, and to assist in the correction of discrepancies.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 734, § 9, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(1) amended, p. 1417, § 66, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(2) amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 719, § 62, effective May 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-7-105 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

In 2013, subsection (2) was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-7-109. Judges to keep pollbooks. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 734, § 9, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 99:

(2) amended, p. 162, § 16, effective August 4.

L. 2013:

Entire section repealed, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 752, § 138, effective May 10.

Cross references:

In 2013, this section was repealed by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-7-110. Preparing to vote in person.

When an elector appears in person to vote, a signature card containing the elector's name and residential address, as they appear in the statewide voter registration system created in section 1-2-301, shall be completed. Unless an elector is registering for the first time or updating the elector's voter registration information, the elector shall not be required to provide any information on the signature card in addition to the elector's name, residential address, and signature.

Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, an eligible elector desiring to vote in person shall show his or her identification as defined in section 1-1-104 (19.5), verify the information that appears on the signature card, sign the signature card, and give the signature card to one of the election judges. An eligible elector who is unable to write may request assistance from one of the election judges, who shall also sign the signature card and witness the eligible elector's mark. The signature card must provide:

If the eligible elector shows his or her identification within the meaning of section 1-1-104 (19.5) and the elector's name is found on the registration list or, where applicable, the property owner's list by the election judge in charge, the judge in charge of the pollbook or list shall enter the eligible elector's name, and the eligible elector shall be allowed to enter the immediate voting area. Besides the election officials, no more than four electors more than the number of voting booths shall be allowed within the immediate voting area at one time.

(2.5) If the elector's qualification to vote is established by the completion of an affidavit, and if the affidavit contains all of the information required in subsection (1) of this section, then the designated election official shall consider the affidavit the signature card.

The election judges shall return the signed signature cards with other election materials to the designated election official.

An eligible elector who is unable to produce identification may cast a provisional ballot in accordance with article 8.5 of this title.

An eligible elector who does not reside within the county but wishes to vote at a polling location is entitled to receive a mail ballot or replacement mail ballot that contains the names of candidates for statewide federal and state offices and statewide ballot issues and ballot questions. The secretary of state shall certify the content of the ballot to the county clerk and recorder.

I, ....................., affirm under penalty of perjury that I am a United States citizen and an eligible elector; I have been a Colorado resident for at least twenty-two days immediately before this election; I am registered to vote at my sole legal place of residence; I will be at least eighteen years of age on election day; and this is the only ballot I have voted in this election.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 735, § 9, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 94:

(2.5) added, p. 1163, § 34, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(1) and (2) amended and (4) added, p. 1277, § 2, effective April 22.

L. 2004:

(2) amended, p. 1053, § 5, effective May 21; (2) amended, p. 1357, § 16, effective May 28.

L. 2005:

(4) amended, p. 1404, § 25, effective June 6; (4) amended, p. 1439, § 25, effective June 6.

L. 2007:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 1978, § 25, effective August 3.

L. 2013:

(1) amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 719, § 63, effective May 10.

L. 2014:

(1), (2.5), and (3) amended, (SB 14-161), ch. 160, p. 561, § 13, effective May 9.

L. 2019:

(5) added, (HB 19-1278), ch. 326, p. 3028, § 36, effective August 2.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1647, § 34, effective June 21.

1-7-111. Electors requiring assistance.

If at any election, any registered elector declares to the election judges that, by reason of disability, inability to read or write, or difficulties with the English language, he or she is unable to prepare the ballot or operate the voting device or electronic voting device without assistance, the elector is entitled, upon making a request, to receive the assistance of any one of the election judges or, at the elector's option, any person selected by the eligible elector requiring assistance.

Any person other than an election judge who assists an eligible elector in the precinct in casting his or her ballot shall first complete the following voter assistance self-affirmation form: "I, ...................., certify that I am the individual chosen by the elector to assist the elector in casting a ballot. I further certify that I will not in any way attempt to persuade or induce the elector to vote in a particular manner, nor will I cast the elector's vote other than as directed by the elector I am assisting.".

and (3) Repealed.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 735, § 9, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1417, § 68, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(2) amended, p. 1773, § 78, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(1) amended, p. 1086, § 2, effective May 26.

L. 2004:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1358, § 17, effective May 28.

L. 2007:

(2) amended, p. 1779, § 15, effective June 1.

L. 2012:

(1)(a) and (1)(b) amended, (HB 12-1292), ch. 181, p. 684, § 26, effective May 17.

L. 2013:

(2) amended and (3) repealed, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 719, § 64, effective May 10.

L. 2014:

(1)(a) and (1)(b) amended and (2) repealed, (SB 14-161), ch. 160, p. 562, § 14, effective May 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-7-108 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

(1) For disclosing or identifying vote, see § 1-13-712.

(2) For the legislative declaration contained in the 2004 act amending subsection (1)(a), see section 1 of chapter 334, Session Laws of Colorado 2004.

(3) In 2013, subsection (2) was amended and subsection (3) was repealed by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-7-112. Non-English speaking electors - assistance. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 736, § 9, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(1) amended, p. 1418, § 69, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1358, § 18, effective May 28.

L. 2012:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 12-1292), ch. 181, p. 685, § 27, effective May 17.

L. 2014:

Entire section repealed, (SB 14-161), ch. 160, p. 567, § 29, effective May 9.

Editor's note:

Prior to its repeal, this section was similar to former § 1-7-109 as it existed prior to 1992.

1-7-113. Influencing electors.

No person who assists an elector as authorized by this title shall seek to persuade or induce the eligible elector to vote in a particular manner.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 737, § 9, effective January 1, 1993.

1-7-114. Write-in votes.

Eligible electors may cast a write-in vote for a candidate who has filed an affidavit of intent of write-in candidacy pursuant to section 1-4-1101 by writing the name of the person in the blank space provided for write-in candidates on the ballot. Each write-in vote may include a reasonably correct spelling of a given name, an initial or nickname, or both a given name and an initial or nickname, and shall include the last name of the person for whom the vote is intended. Whenever write-in votes are cast, they shall be counted only when the intention of the elector is clearly apparent.

A vote for a write-in candidate shall not be counted unless that candidate is qualified to hold the office for which the elector's vote was cast.

If the elector has cast more votes for an office than he or she is lawfully entitled to cast, by voting for both a candidate appearing on the ballot and a valid write-in candidate, neither of the votes for the office shall be counted.

The designated election official shall make a list of eligible write-in candidates and provide the list to the election judges. The order of the write-in candidates on such list may be determined by the time of filing the affidavit pursuant to section 1-4-1101.

Except as may be required to accommodate a person with a disability, election judges shall not verbally comment on write-in candidates. Upon request of an eligible elector, an election judge may display to the requesting elector the list of eligible write-in candidates provided to the judges by the designated election official. The list shall not be posted nor may the list be taken into a voting booth.

A designated election official may post the list of eligible write-in candidates on the official website of the designated election official.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 737, § 9, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(1) amended, p. 1419, § 70, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(4) added, p. 1746, § 41, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

(4)(c) added, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 580, § 45, effective May 18.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 1-7-309 (3) and 1-7-507 (3) as they existed prior to 1992. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

1-7-115. Time in voting area.

Eligible electors shall cast their ballots without undue delay and shall leave the immediate voting area as soon as voting is complete. An eligible elector shall not enter a voting booth already occupied by another eligible elector. An eligible elector shall not occupy a voting booth for longer than the time determined by the secretary of state by rule if all the booths are in use and other eligible electors are waiting to use them. No eligible elector whose name has been entered on the pollbook shall be allowed to reenter the immediate voting area during the election, except an election judge.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 737, § 9, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1766, § 7, effective June 6.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1163, § 35, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 1979, § 26, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-7-304 (3) as it existed prior to 1992.

1-7-116. Coordinated elections - definition.

If more than one political subdivision holds an election on the same day in November and the eligible electors for each such election are the same or the boundaries overlap, the county clerk and recorder is the coordinated election official and, pursuant to section 1-5-401, shall conduct the elections on behalf of all political subdivisions whose elections are part of the coordinated election, utilizing the mail ballot procedure set forth in article 7.5 of this title. As used in this subsection (1), "political subdivision" includes the state, counties, municipalities, school districts, and special districts formed pursuant to title 32, C.R.S.

Paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) does not apply to any political subdivision that conducts a mail ballot election or an independent mail ballot election, as defined in section 1-13.5-1102, using mail ballot procedures set forth in article 7.5 or 13.5 of this title or the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965", article 10 of title 31, C.R.S., as appropriate. As used in this paragraph (b), "political subdivision" means a municipality as defined in section 31-1-101, C.R.S., or a special district as defined in section 1-13.5-103.

A county clerk and recorder is not required to conduct any election using the procedures set forth in article 13.5 of this title.

On and after January 1, 2023, a statutory city or town or home rule municipality may refer a municipal election using instant runoff voting to be conducted as part of a coordinated election in accordance with section 1-7-118. If required by section 1-7-118, a county clerk and recorder shall conduct the election on behalf of the municipality as part of the coordinated election in accordance with this section and section 1-7-118. Failure to receive the notice required by section 1-7-118 in a timely manner does not prohibit the county clerk and recorder from entering into and performing an intergovernmental agreement to conduct the instant runoff voting election as part of the coordinated election.

The political subdivisions for which the county clerk and recorder will conduct the coordinated election shall enter into an agreement with the county clerk and recorder for the county or counties in which the political subdivision is located concerning the conduct of the coordinated election. The agreement shall be signed no later than seventy days prior to the scheduled election. The agreement shall include but not be limited to the following:

Allocation of the responsibilities between the county clerk and recorder and the political subdivisions for the preparation and conduct of the coordinated election; and

Provision for a reasonable sharing of the actual cost of the coordinated election among the county and the political subdivisions. For such purpose, political subdivisions are not responsible for sharing any portion of the usual costs of maintaining the office of the county clerk and recorder, including but not limited to overhead costs and personal services costs of permanent employees, except for such costs that are shown to be directly attributable to conducting coordinated elections on behalf of political subdivisions. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the state's share of the actual costs of the coordinated election shall be governed by the provisions of section 1-5-505.5. Where the state's reimbursement to a particular county for the costs of conducting a coordinated election pursuant to section 1-5-505.5 is less than the costs of conducting a coordinated election for which the county is entitled to reimbursement by means of a cost-sharing agreement entered into pursuant to the provisions of this subsection (2), such differential shall be assumed by the county. Where the state's reimbursement to a particular county for the costs of conducting a coordinated election pursuant to section 1-5-505.5 is greater than the costs of conducting a coordinated election for which the county is entitled to reimbursement by means of a cost-sharing agreement entered into pursuant to the provisions of this subsection (2), the county shall be entitled to retain such differential, with no obligation to return any portion of such amount to the state.

(2.5) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the scientific and cultural facilities district's share of the actual costs of the coordinated election shall be governed by the provisions of section 32-13-107 (5), C.R.S.

Notwithstanding the provision for independent mail ballot elections in subsection (1) of this section, the ballot issue notice shall be prepared and mailed in substantial compliance with part 9 of this article 7, and the preparation and mailing thereof shall be made pursuant to an agreement as provided in subsection (2) of this section. An agreement under this subsection (3) may allow the political subdivision to prepare and mail a separate notice.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 94, p. 1163, § 36, effective July 1, 1994.)

If, by one hundred days before the election, a political subdivision has taken formal action to participate in an election that will be coordinated by the county clerk and recorder, the political subdivision shall notify the county clerk and recorder in writing. Failure to receive such notice in a timely manner does not prohibit the county clerk and recorder from entering into and performing an intergovernmental agreement to conduct the coordinated election on behalf of the political subdivision.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 737, § 9, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1419, § 71, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(1), (2)(b), and (4) amended, p. 1163, § 36, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(3) amended, p. 1746, § 42, effective July 1.

L. 99:

IP(2) amended and (5) added, p. 774, § 50, effective May 20.

L. 2000:

(2)(b) amended, p. 656, § 3, effective August 2.

L. 2001:

(5) amended, p. 1003, § 9, effective August 8.

L. 2005:

IP(2) amended, p. 1404, § 26, effective June 6; IP(2) amended, p. 1439, § 26, effective June 6.

L. 2006:

(2.5) added, p. 1779, § 1, effective June 6.

L. 2013:

(1) amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 720, § 65, effective May 10.

L. 2014:

(1) and (5) amended, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 4, § 3, effective February 18.

L. 2019:

(3) amended, (HB 19-1278), ch. 326, p. 3028, § 37, effective August 2.

L. 2021:

(1)(d) added, (HB 21-1071), ch. 367, p. 2418, § 9, effective July 1, 2022.

Cross references:

(1) In 2013, this section was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

(2) For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1164, see section 1 of chapter 2, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

(3) For the short title ("Colorado Votes Act") in HB 19-1278, see section 1 of chapter 326, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

1-7-117. Joint elections. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 738, § 9, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

Entire section repealed, p. 1420, § 72, effective July 1.

1-7-118. Ranked voting in a coordinated election - procedure - costs - definition.

On and after January 1, 2023, a municipality located in a single county that takes formal action to conduct an election using instant runoff voting may refer the election to be conducted as part of a coordinated election, as defined in section 1-7-116, by providing written notice to the county clerk and recorder conducting the election at least one hundred days before the election. If the county uses a voting system that is certified by the secretary of state for use in an election using instant runoff voting, the county clerk and recorder shall conduct the election as part of the coordinated election in accordance with this section and section 1-7-116. In addition to the requirements of section 1-7-116 (2), the agreement between the county clerk and recorder and the municipality must include a plan for conducting the voter education campaign required by section 1-7-1003 (5)(b). The county clerk and recorder conducting the election shall, with input from the municipality, determine the maximum number of choices an elector may rank in accordance with section 1-7-1003 (1).

A municipality that refers an election using instant runoff voting to be conducted as part of a coordinated election shall pay for the reasonable increased costs associated with the use of instant runoff voting in the coordinated election, including but not limited to costs related to election setup licensing costs pursuant to section 1-5-603 (2), programming, ballot design, additional voter information and education, and tabulation.

On and after July 1, 2026, a municipality located in more than one county that takes formal action to conduct an election using instant runoff voting may refer the election to be conducted as part of a coordinated election, as defined in section 1-7-116, by providing written notice to each county clerk and recorder conducting the election at least one hundred days before the election. The county clerk and recorder of each such county shall conduct the election as part of the coordinated election only if:

The municipality timely provides the notice required by subsection (1) of this section to each county clerk and recorder;

Each county clerk and recorder uses a voting system that is certified by the secretary of state for use in an election using instant runoff voting; and

The data from the voting systems used by all such counties can be tabulated together in accordance with rules established by the secretary of state in accordance with subsection (5) of this section.

If the requirements of subsection (3)(a) of this section are met, the municipality and the counties shall enter into an agreement concerning the conduct of the election in accordance with section 1-7-116 (2). In addition to the requirements of section 1-7-116 (2), the agreement must:

Include a plan for conducting the voter education campaign required by section 1-7-1003 (5)(b);

Establish the maximum number of choices an elector may rank on the ballot in accordance with section 1-7-1003 (1); and

Adopt procedures for the county canvass boards to reconcile the ballots and certify the abstract of votes for the instant runoff voting election in accordance with rules established by the secretary of state pursuant to subsection (5) of this section.

If the requirements of subsection (3)(a) of this section are not met, the instant runoff voting election shall not be conducted as part of the coordinated election. The municipality may conduct the election in accordance with part 10 of this article 7 or the municipality's charter, as applicable, and the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965", article 10 of title 31.

For each election using instant runoff voting that is conducted as part of a coordinated election:

Each county clerk and recorder conducting the election shall provide the explanation of ranked voting and instructions for electors required by section 1-7-1003 (5)(a); and

If the instant runoff voting election is conducted in multiple counties pursuant to subsection (3)(a) of this section, each county canvass board shall certify the abstract of votes cast and provide tabulation data to the designated election official for the municipality in accordance with rules promulgated by the secretary of state.

On or before April 1, 2023, the secretary of state shall adopt rules concerning the tabulation, reporting, and canvassing of results for a coordinated election using instant runoff voting conducted by a single county. On or before January 1, 2025, the rules must include provisions for an instant runoff voting election conducted by multiple counties.

As used in this section, "municipality" means a statutory city or town or a home rule municipality.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (HB 21-1071), ch. 367, p. 2419, § 10, effective July 1, 2022.